New Jersey, session 222, A168.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.1991, c.181 (C.54:15B-2.1) is amended to read as follows: 7.  a.  "Gross receipts," as otherwise defined by section 2 of P.L.1990, c.42 (C.54:15B-2), shall not include:  (1) receipts from sales of petroleum products used by marine vessels engaged in interstate or foreign commerce [and] ; (2) receipts from sales of aviation fuels used by common carriers in interstate or foreign commerce other than the "burnout" portion which shall be taxable pursuant to rules promulgated by the director; and (3) receipts from sales of dyed fuel as defined by section 2 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-102), unless used in a motor vehicle for operation on the public highways. b.  Highway fuel used for the following purposes is exempt from the tax imposed by section 3 of P.L.1990, c.42 (C.54:15B-3), and a refund of the tax imposed by that section may be claimed by the consumer providing proof the tax has been paid and no refund has been previously issued: (1)   autobuses while being operated over the highways of this State in those municipalities to which the operator has paid a monthly franchise tax for the use of the streets therein under the provisions of R.S.48:16-25 and autobuses while being operated over the highways of this State in a regular route bus operation as defined in R.S.48:4-1 and under operating authority conferred pursuant to R.S.48:4-3, or while providing bus service under a contract with the New Jersey Transit Corporation or under a contract with a county for special or rural transportation bus service subject to the jurisdiction of the New Jersey Transit Corporation pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.), and autobuses providing commuter bus service which receive or discharge passengers in New Jersey.  For the purpose of this paragraph "commuter bus service" means regularly scheduled passenger service provided by motor vehicles whether within or across the geographical boundaries of New Jersey and utilized by passengers using reduced fare, multiple ride, or commutation tickets and shall not include charter bus operations for the transportation of enrolled children and adults referred to in subsection c. of R.S.48:4-1 and "regular route service" does not mean a regular route in the nature of special bus operation or a casino bus operation; (2)   agricultural tractors not operated on a public highway; (3)   farm machinery; (4)   ambulances; (5)   rural free delivery carriers in the dispatch of their official business; (6)   vehicles that run only on rails or tracks, and such vehicles as run in substitution therefor; (7)   highway motor vehicles that are operated exclusively on private property; (8)   motor boats or motor vessels used exclusively for or in the propagation, planting, preservation and gathering of oysters and clams in the tidal waters of this State; (9)   motor boats or motor vessels used exclusively for commercial fishing; (10)  motor boats or motor vessels, while being used for hire for fishing parties or being used for sightseeing or excursion parties; (11)  fire engines and fire-fighting apparatus; (12) stationary machinery and vehicles or implements not designed for the use of transporting persons or property on the public highways; (13)  heating and lighting devices; (14)  motor boats or motor vessels used exclusively for Sea Scout training by a duly chartered unit of the Boy Scouts of America; [and] (15)  emergency vehicles used exclusively by volunteer first-aid or rescue squads; and (16)  school buses operated for the transportation of pupils to or from school or a school-sponsored activity or event by a religious or other charitable organization or corporation or by a person under contract with a public or governmental agency or a religious or other charitable organization or corporation.  For the purpose of this paragraph school buses means school bus as that term is defined by R.S.39:1-1. (cf: P.L.2016, c.57, s.13) 2.    Section 12 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-112) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a.  Fuel used for the following purposes is exempt from the tax imposed by the "Motor Fuel Tax Act," P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-101 et seq.), and a refund of the tax imposed by subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-103) may be claimed by the consumer providing proof the tax has been paid and no refund has been previously issued: (1)   Autobuses while being operated over the highways of this State in those municipalities to which the operator has paid a monthly franchise tax for the use of the streets therein under the provisions of R.S.48:16-25 and autobuses while being operated over the highways of this State in a regular route bus operation as defined in R.S.48:4-1 and under operating authority conferred pursuant to R.S.48:4-3, or while providing bus service under a contract with the New Jersey Transit Corporation or under a contract with a county for special or rural transportation bus service subject to the jurisdiction of the New Jersey Transit Corporation pursuant to P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-1 et seq.), and autobuses providing commuter bus service which receive or discharge passengers in New Jersey.  For the purpose of this paragraph "commuter bus service" means regularly scheduled passenger service provided by motor vehicles whether within or across the geographical boundaries of New Jersey and utilized by passengers using reduced fare, multiple ride or commutation tickets and shall not include charter bus operations for the transportation of enrolled children and adults referred to in subsection c. of R.S.48:4-1 and "regular route service" does not mean a regular route in the nature of special bus operation or a casino bus operation, (2)   agricultural tractors not operated on a public highway, (3)   farm machinery, (4)   aircraft, (5)   ambulances, (6)   rural free delivery carriers in the dispatch of their official business, (7)   vehicles that run only on rails or tracks, and such vehicles as run in substitution therefor, (8)   highway motor vehicles that are operated exclusively on private property, (9)   motor boats or motor vessels used exclusively for or in the propagation, planting, preservation and gathering of oysters and clams in the tidal waters of this State, (10) motor boats or motor vessels used exclusively for commercial fishing, (11)  motor boats or motor vessels, while being used for hire for fishing parties or being used for sightseeing or excursion parties, (12)  cleaning, (13)  fire engines and fire-fighting apparatus, (14) stationary machinery and vehicles or implements not designed for the use of transporting persons or property on the public highways, (15)  heating and lighting devices, (16) motor boats or motor vessels used exclusively for Sea Scout training by a duly chartered unit of the Boy Scouts of America, (17) emergency vehicles used exclusively by volunteer first-aid or rescue squads, [and] (18)  three cents per gallon, the difference between the rate of tax on diesel fuel and the rate of tax on gasoline, for diesel fuel used by passenger automobiles and motor vehicles of less than 5,000 pounds gross weight, and (19)  school buses operated for the transportation of pupils to or from school or a school-sponsored activity or event by a religious or other charitable organization or corporation or by a person under contract with a public or governmental agency or a religious or other charitable organization or corporation.  For the purpose of this paragraph school buses means school bus as that term is defined by R.S.39:1-1. b.    Subject to the procedural requirements and conditions set out in the "Motor Fuel Tax Act," P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-101 et seq.), the following uses are exempt from the tax imposed by section 3 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-103) on fuel, and a deduction or a refund may be claimed by the supplier, permissive supplier or licensed distributor: (1)   fuel for which proof of export, satisfactory to the director, is available and is either: (a)   removed by a licensed supplier for immediate export to a state in which the supplier has a valid license; (b)   removed from a terminal by a licensed distributor for immediate export as evidenced by the terminal issued shipping papers; or (c)   acquired by a licensed distributor and which the tax imposed by P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-101 et al.) has previously been paid or accrued either as a result of being stored outside of the terminal transfer system immediately prior to loading or as a diversion across state boundaries properly reported in conformity with P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-101 et al.) and was subsequently exported from this State on behalf of the distributor. The exemption pursuant to subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this paragraph shall be claimed by a deduction on the report of the supplier which is otherwise responsible for remitting the tax upon removal of the product from a terminal or refinery in this State. The exemption pursuant to subparagraph (c) of this paragraph shall be claimed by the distributor, upon a refund application made to the director within six months of the licensed distributor's acquisition of the fuel; (2)   undyed kerosene sold to a licensed ultimate vendor - blocked pumps; if the licensed ultimate vendor - blocked pumps does not sell the kerosene through dispensers that have been designed and constructed to prevent delivery directly from the dispenser into a motor vehicle fuel supply tank, the ultimate vendor - blocked pumps shall be responsible for the tax imposed by section 3 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-103) at the diesel fuel rate.  Exempt use of undyed kerosene shall be governed by rules and regulations of the director.  If rules or regulations are not promulgated by the director, then the exempt use of undyed kerosene shall be governed by rules and regulations of the Internal Revenue Service.  An ultimate vendor-blocked pumps who obtained undyed kerosene upon which the tax levied by section 3 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-103) had been paid and makes sales qualifying pursuant to this subsection may apply for a refund of the tax pursuant to an application, as provided by section 14 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-114), to the director provided the ultimate vendor-blocked pumps did not charge that tax to the consumer; (3)   fuel sold to the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, and to the State of New Jersey and its political subdivisions, departments and agencies; (4)   aviation fuel sold to a licensed aviation fuel dealer; (5)   liquefied petroleum gas except when delivered to the tank of a highway vehicle; (6)   motor fuel on which tax has been paid under this act that is later contaminated in a manner making it unsuitable for taxable use.  This credit or refund is limited to the remaining portion of taxed fuel in the contaminated mixture and is conditioned upon submitting to the director adequate documentation that the contaminated mixture was subsequently used in an exempt manner; (7)   fuel on which tax has been paid pursuant to P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-101 et al.) that is either subsequently delivered back into the terminal transfer system for further distribution or delivered to a refinery for further processing; (8)   fuel on which tax has been previously imposed and paid pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2010, c.22 (C.54:39-103) and which is either subsequently exported, sold or distributed in this State in a manner which would result in a second tax being owed.  If there is a second taxable distribution or sale, the party responsible for remittance of the second tax shall be the party eligible for claiming the refund or deduction; (9)   Fuel grade alcohol, biobased liquid fuel, or biodiesel fuel when sold to a licensed supplier and delivered to a qualified terminal. (cf: P.L.2015, c.101, s.2) 3.  R.S.54:38-1 is amended to read as follows: 54:38-1.  a.  In addition to the inheritance, succession or legacy taxes imposed by this State under authority of chapters 33 to 36 of this title (R.S.54:33-1 et seq.), or hereafter imposed under authority of any subsequent enactment, there is hereby imposed an estate or transfer tax: (1)   Upon the transfer of the estate of every resident decedent dying before January 1, 2002 which is subject to an estate tax payable to the United States under the provisions of the federal revenue act of one thousand nine hundred and twenty-six and the amendments thereof and supplements thereto or any other federal revenue act in effect as of the date of death of the decedent, the amount of which tax shall be the sum by which the maximum credit allowable against any federal estate tax payable to the United States under any federal revenue act on account of taxes paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, shall exceed the aggregate amount of all estate, inheritance, succession or legacy taxes actually paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, including inheritance, succession or legacy taxes actually paid this State, in respect to any property owned by such decedent or subject to such taxes as a part of or in connection with the estate; and (2)  (a)  Upon the transfer of the estate of every resident decedent dying after December 31, 2001, but before January 1, 2017, which would have been subject to an estate tax payable to the United States under the provisions of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.1 et seq.) in effect on December 31, 2001, the amount of which tax shall be, at the election of the person or corporation liable for the payment of the tax under this chapter, either (i)    the maximum credit that would have been allowable under the provisions of that federal Internal Revenue Code in effect on that date against the federal estate tax that would have been payable under the provisions of that federal Internal Revenue Code in effect on that date on account of taxes paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, or (ii)   determined pursuant to the simplified tax system as may be prescribed by the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury to produce a liability similar to the liability determined pursuant to clause (i) of this paragraph reduced pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection. (b)   The amount of tax liability determined pursuant to subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall be reduced by the aggregate amount of all estate, inheritance, succession or legacy taxes actually paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, including inheritance, succession or legacy taxes actually paid this State, in respect to any property owned by such decedent or subject to such taxes as a part of or in connection with the estate; provided however, that the amount of the reduction shall not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this subsection that the amount of the estates's property subject to tax by other jurisdictions bears to the entire estate taxable under this chapter. (3)  (a)  Upon the transfer of the estate of each resident decedent dying on or after January 1, 2017, whether or not subject to an estate tax payable to the United States under the provisions of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.1 et seq.), the amount of the taxable estate, determined pursuant to section 2051 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.2051), but without the deduction of any estate inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes actually paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia pursuant to the provisions of section 2058 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s. 2058) in effect on January 1, 2017, shall be subject to tax pursuant to the following schedule: On any amount up to $100,000 .................................................0.0% On any amount in excess of $100,000, up to $150,000  . . . . 0.8% of the excess over $100,000 On any amount in excess of $150,000, up to $200,000. . . . . . $400 plus 1.6% of the excess over $150,000 On any amount in excess of $200,000, up to $300,000. . . . . . . . .  $1,200 plus 2.4% of the excess over $200,000 On any amount in excess of $300,000, up to $500,000. . . . . . . . .  $3,600 plus 3.2% of the excess over $300,000 On any amount in excess of $500,000, up to $700,000. . . . . . . . .  $10,000 plus 4.0% of the excess over $500,000 On any amount in excess of $700,000, up to $900,000. . . . . . . . .  $18,000 plus 4.8% of the excess over $700,000 On any amount in excess of $900,000, up to $1,100,000. . . . . . . .  $27,600 plus 5.6% of the excess over $900,000 On any amount in excess of $1,100,000, up to $1,600,000. . . . $38,800 plus 6.4% of the excess over $1,100,000 On any amount in excess of $1,600,000, up to $2,100,000. . . . . $70,800 plus 7.2% of the excess over $1,600,000 On any amount in excess of $2,100,000, up to $2,600,000. . . . . $106,800 plus 8.0% of the excess over $2,100,000 On any amount in excess of $2,600,000, up to $3,100,000. . . . $146,800 plus 8.8% of the excess over $2,600,000 On any amount in excess of $3,100,000, up to $3,600,000. . . . . $190,800 plus 9.6% of the excess over $3,100,000 On any amount in excess of $3,600,000, up to $4,100,000. . . . . $238,800 plus 10.4% of the excess over $3,600,000 On any amount in excess of $4,100,000, up to $5,100,000. . . . . $290,800 plus 11.2% of the excess over $4,100,000 On any amount in excess of $5,100,000, up to $6,100,000 . . . . $402,800 plus 12.0% of the excess over $5,100,000 On any amount in excess of $6,100,000, up to $7,100,000 . . . . . $522,800 plus 12.8% of the excess over $6,100,000 On any amount in excess of $7,100,000, up to $8,100,000 . . . . . $650,800 plus 13.6% of the excess over $7,100,000 On any amount in excess of $8,100,000, up to $9,100,000 . . . . .  $786,800 plus 14.4% of the excess over $8,100,000 On any amount in excess of $9,100,000, up to $10,100,000 . . . . $930,800 plus 15.2% of the excess over $9,100,000 On any amount in excess of $10,100,000. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,082,800 plus 16.0% of the excess over $10,100,000 (b)   A credit shall be allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to subparagraph (a) of this paragraph equal to the amount of tax which would be determined by subparagraph (a) of this paragraph if the amount of the taxable estate were equal to the exclusion amount. For the transfer of the estate of each resident decedent dying on or after January 1, 2017, but before January 1, 2018, the exclusion amount is $2,000,000. (c)   The amount of tax liability of a resident decedent determined pursuant to subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this paragraph shall be reduced by the aggregate amount of all estate, inheritance, succession or legacy taxes actually paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, including inheritance taxes actually paid this State, in respect to any property owned by that decedent or subject to those taxes as a part of or in connection with the estate; provided however, that the amount of the reduction shall not exceed the proportion of the tax otherwise due under this subsection that the amount of the estate's property subject to tax by other jurisdictions bears to the entire estate taxable under this chapter. (4)   For the transfer of the estate of each resident decedent dying on or after January 1, 2018, there shall be no tax imposed. b.  (1)  In the case of the estate of a decedent dying before January 1, 2002 where no inheritance, succession or legacy tax is due this State under the provisions of chapters 33 to 36 of this title or under authority of any subsequent enactment imposing taxes of a similar nature, but an estate tax is due the United States under the provisions of any federal revenue act in effect as of the date of death, wherein provision is made for a credit on account of taxes paid the several states or territories of the United States, or the District of Columbia, the tax imposed by this chapter shall be the maximum amount of such credit less the aggregate amount of such estate, inheritance, succession or legacy taxes actually paid to any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia. (2)   In the case of the estate of a decedent dying after December 31, 2001, but before January 1, 2017, where no inheritance, succession or legacy tax is due this State under the provisions of chapters 33 to 36 of this title or under authority of any subsequent enactment imposing taxes of a similar nature, the tax imposed by this chapter shall be determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section. (3)   In the case of the estate of a decedent dying on or after January 1, 2017 the tax imposed by this chapter shall be determined pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection a. of this section. c.     For the purposes of this section, a "simplified tax system" to produce a liability similar to the liability determined pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (a) of paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section is a tax system that is based upon the $675,000 unified estate and gift tax applicable exclusion amount in effect under the provisions of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.1 et seq.) in effect on December 31, 2001, and results in general in the determination of a similar amount of tax but which will enable the person or corporation liable for the payment of the tax to calculate an amount of tax notwithstanding the lack or paucity of information for compliance due to such factors as the absence of an estate valuation made for federal estate tax purposes, the absence of a measure of the impact of gifts made during the lifetime of the decedent in the absence of federal gift tax information, and any other information compliance problems as the director determines are the result of the phased repeal of the federal estate tax. (cf: P.L.2016, c.57, s.7) 4.  Section 19 of P.L.2016, c.57 (C.52:18A-257) is amended to read as follows: 19.  a.  The State Treasurer, and the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer, together with a third public member who shall be jointly selected thereby, shall constitute the review council. b.    The review council shall, on or before January 15, 2020, provide the Governor and the Legislature with an advisory report of their consensus estimate of the increase or decrease in State revenues pursuant to each section of P.L.2016, c.57 (C.54:15B-13 et al.), and pursuant to this act as a whole, during the preceding three State fiscal years, including a comparison of those estimates to the legislative fiscal estimate or fiscal note published contemporaneous with the enactment of this act prepared pursuant to P.L.1980, c.67 (C.52:13B-6 et seq.). c.     The review council shall conduct an ongoing review of the application of each section of P.L.2016, c.57 (C.54:15B-13 et al.). The review council shall, not later than five days after any Legislative action that halts, delays, or reverses the implementation of those sections as scheduled on the date of enactment of P.L.2016, c.57 (C.54:15B-13 et al.), certify for the purposes of subparagraph (h) of paragraph (1) of subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.1990, c.42 (C.54:15B-3) to the Director of the Division of Taxation that the scheduled implementation of P.L.2016, c.57 (C.54:15B-13 et al.) had been impeded. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to sections 1, 2, and 3 of P.L.    , c.   (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill. (cf:  P.L.2016, c.57, s.19) 5.    This act shall take effect immediately; provided however that sections 1 and 2 shall apply to highway fuel and fuel used on or after the first day of the first month next following the date of enactment and section 3 shall apply retroactively to the estate of each resident decedent dying on or after January 1, 2017.